Utah statutes.
35A-3-103.5.   Employment first emphasis on the provision of services.

(1)  As used in this section, "recipient" means an individual who:

(a)  has a disability;

(b)  suffers from a mental illness; or

(c)  is undergoing treatment for a substance abuse problem.

(2)  When providing services to a recipient in the programs provided under this chapter, the department shall, within funds appropriated by the Legislature and in accordance with the requirements of federal and state law and memorandums of understanding between the department and other state entities that provide services to a recipient, give priority to providing services that assist an eligible recipient in obtaining and retaining meaningful and gainful employment that enables the recipient to earn sufficient income to:

(a)  purchase goods and services;

(b)  establish self-sufficiency; and

(c)  exercise economic control of the recipient's life.

(3)  The department shall develop a written plan to implement the policy described in Subsection (2) that includes:

(a)  assessing the strengths and needs of a recipient;

(b)  customizing strength-based approaches to obtaining employment;

(c)  expecting, encouraging, providing, and rewarding:

(i)  integrated employment in the workplace at competitive wages and benefits; and

(ii)  self-employment;

(d)  developing partnerships with potential employers;

(e)  maximizing appropriate employment training opportunities;

(f)  coordinating services with other government agencies and community resources;

(g)  to the extent possible, eliminating practices and policies that interfere with the policy described in Subsection (2); and

(h)  arranging sub-minimum wage work or volunteer work for an eligible recipient when employment at market rates cannot be obtained.

(4)  The department shall, on an annual basis:

(a)  set goals to implement the policy described in Subsection (2) and the plan described in Subsection (3);

(b)  determine whether the goals for the previous year have been met; and

(c)  modify the plan described in Subsection (3) as needed.



Amended by Chapter 305, 2012 General Session

